Utah statutes.
78B-5-805.   State, state officers, and political subdivisions not required
to give bond.
In any civil action or proceeding in which the state is a party plaintiff, or
any state officer in his official capacity or on behalf of the state, or any
county or city or other public corporation is a party plaintiff or defendant,
no bond, written undertaking, or security may be required of the state, or any
state officer, or of any county or city or other public corporation.  Upon
compliance with the other provisions of the law, the state, or any state
officer acting in an official capacity, or any county or city or other public
corporation, has the same rights, remedies and benefits as if the bond,
undertaking or security were given and approved as required by law.
